Utah statutes.
16-10a-833.   Contract rights with respect to officers.
(1)  The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.
(2)  An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if
any, with the corporation.  An officer's resignation does not affect the
corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.
